pt-BR: Posição da câmera do telefone: Dianteira; Monocromático; Profundidade traseira; Macro traseira; Principal traseira; Periscópio traseiro; Telefoto traseira; Ultra grande angular traseira; Grande angular traseira; Tempo de voo (ToF); Outro
th: ตำแหน่งกล้องโทรศัพท์: ด้านหน้า; ขาวดำ; ความลึกด้านหลัง; มาโครด้านหลัง; หลักด้านหลัง; เพอริสโคปด้านหลัง; เทเลโฟโต้ด้านหลัง; อัลตร้าไวด์ด้านหลัง; มุมกว้างด้านหลัง; เวลาของการบิน (ToF); อื่นๆ
fi: Puhelimen kameran sijainti: Etuosa; Mustavalkoinen; Takasyvyys; Takamakro; Pääkamera takana; Takaperiskoopin; Takateleobjektiivi; Takaultrawide; Takalaajakulma; Lentoaika (ToF); Muu
tr: Telefon kamera konumu: Ön taraf; Tek renkli; Arka derinlik; Arka makro; Arka ana; Arka periskop; Arka telefoto; Arka ultra geniş; Arka geniş açı; Uçuş süresi (ToF); Diğer
ja: 電話カメラの位置: フロント; モノクロ; 背面深度; 背面マクロ; 背面メイン; 背面ペリスコープ; 背面望遠; 背面超広角; 背面広角; ToF（Time-of-Flight）; その他
pl: Pozycja kamery telefonu: Przód; Monochromatyczne; Tylny głębi; Tylny makro; Tylny główny; Tylny peryskopowy; Tylny teleobiektyw; Tylny ultraszerokokątny; Tylny szerokokątny; Czujnik czasu przelotu (ToF); Inne
hu: Telefon kamera pozíciója: Elöl; Monokróm; Hátlapi mélységérzékelő; Hátlapi makró; Hátlapi fő; Hátlapi periszkóp; Hátlapi telefotó; Hátlapi ultraszéles; Hátlapi nagylátószögű; Repülési idő (ToF); Egyéb
sl-SI: Položaj kamere telefona: Spredaj; Enobarvno; Zadnja globinska; Zadnja makro; Zadnja glavna; Zadnja periskopska; Zadnja teleobjektiv; Zadnja ultra širokokotna; Zadnja širokokotna; Časovno-letni senzor (ToF); Drugo
nb: Telefonkameraposisjon: Front; Monokrom; Bakre dybde; Bakre makro; Bakre hoved; Bakre periskop; Bakre telefoto; Bakre ultravidvinkel; Bakre vidvinkel; Time-of-flight (ToF); Annet
ko: 휴대폰 카메라 위치: 앞쪽; 모노크롬; 후면 심도; 후면 매크로; 후면 메인; 후면 페리스코프; 후면 망원; 후면 초광각; 후면 광각; 비행시간 측정 (ToF); 기타
bg-BG: Позиция на камерата на телефона: Отпред; Монохромен; Задна за дълбочина; Задна макро; Задна основна; Задна перископна; Задна телефото; Задна ултраширока; Задна широкоъгълна; Време на полета (ToF); Други
nl: Positie van telefooncamera: Voorkant; Monochroom; Achter diepte; Achter macro; Achter hoofd; Achter periscoop; Achter telelens; Achter ultragroothoek; Achter groothoek; Time-of-flight (ToF); Andere
fr: Position de la caméra du téléphone: Avant; Monochrome; Profondeur arrière; Macro arrière; Principale arrière; Périscope arrière; Téléobjectif arrière; Ultra grand angle arrière; Grand angle arrière; Temps de vol (ToF); Autre
cs: Poloha fotoaparátu v telefonu: Předek; Černobílý; Zadní hloubkový; Zadní makro; Zadní hlavní; Zadní periskopický; Zadní teleobjektiv; Zadní ultraširokoúhlý; Zadní širokoúhlý; Doba letu (ToF); Jiné
sk-SK: Umiestnenie fotoaparátu v telefóne: Predný; Monochromatický; Zadná hĺbková; Zadná makro; Zadná hlavná; Zadná periskopická; Zadná teleobjektív; Zadná ultraširoká; Zadná širokouhlá; Time-of-flight (ToF); Iné
da: Telefonens kameraposition: Front; Monokrom; Bageste dybde; Bageste makro; Bageste primær; Bageste periskop; Bageste telefoto; Bageste ultravidvinkel; Bageste vidvinkel; Time-of-flight (ToF); Andet
lt-LT: Telefono kameros pozicija: Priekis; Vienspalvis; Galinė gylio; Galinė makro; Galinė pagrindinė; Galinė periskopinė; Galinė telefoto; Galinė itin plati; Galinė plačiakampė; Skrydžio laiko (ToF); Kita
ro-RO: Poziția camerei telefonului: În față; Monocrom; Spate adâncime; Spate macro; Spate principală; Spate periscop; Spate telefoto; Spate ultra-wide; Spate unghi larg; Time-of-flight (ToF); Altele
vi: Vị trí camera điện thoại: Trước; Đơn sắc; Độ sâu phía sau; Macro phía sau; Chính phía sau; Periscope phía sau; Telephoto phía sau; Góc siêu rộng phía sau; Góc rộng phía sau; Cảm biến thời gian bay (ToF); Khác
zh-CN: 手机摄像头位置: 前; 单色; 后置景深; 后置微距; 后置主摄; 后置潜望式; 后置长焦; 后置超广角; 后置广角; 飞行时间 (ToF); 其他
en: Phone camera position: Front; Monochrome; Rear depth; Rear macro; Rear main; Rear periscope; Rear telephoto; Rear ultra wide; Rear wide-angle; Time-of-flight (ToF); Other
de: Position der Handykamera: Vorne; Monochrom; Rückseite Tiefe; Rückseite Makro; Rückseite Hauptkamera; Rückseite Periskop; Rückseite Teleobjektiv; Rückseite Ultraweitwinkel; Rückseite Weitwinkel; Laufzeitmessung (ToF); Sonstiges
sv: Telefonkamerans position: Front; Svartvit; Bakre djup; Bakre makro; Bakre huvud; Bakre periskop; Bakre telefoto; Bakre ultravidvinkel; Bakre vidvinkel; Time-of-flight (ToF); Övrigt
es: Posición de la cámara del teléfono: Frontal; Monocromo; Trasera de profundidad; Trasera macro; Trasera principal; Trasera periscopio; Trasera telefoto; Trasera ultra gran angular; Trasera gran angular; Tiempo de vuelo (ToF); Otros
pt-PT: Posição da câmara do telemóvel: Parte dianteira; Monocromático; Profundidade traseira; Macro traseira; Principal traseira; Periscópio traseiro; Telefoto traseira; Ultra grande angular traseira; Grande angular traseira; Tempo de voo (ToF); Outro
it: Posizione della fotocamera del telefono: Anteriore; Monocromatico; Profondità posteriore; Macro posteriore; Principale posteriore; Periscopio posteriore; Teleobiettivo posteriore; Ultra grandangolare posteriore; Grandangolare posteriore; Tempo di volo (ToF); Altro
ru: Положение камеры телефона: Передняя часть; Монохромный; Задняя с датчиком глубины; Задняя макро; Задняя основная; Задняя перископная; Задняя телеобъектив; Задняя сверхширокоугольная; Задняя широкоугольная; Время пролета (ToF); Другой
zh-TW: 手機相機位置: 前; 單色; 後置景深; 後置微距; 後置主鏡頭; 後置潛望式; 後置長焦; 後置超廣角; 後置廣角; 飛時測距（ToF）; 其他
hr-HR: Pozicija kamere telefona: Sprijeda; Jednobojno; Stražnja dubinska; Stražnja makro; Stražnja glavna; Stražnja periskopska; Stražnja telefoto; Stražnja ultra široka; Stražnja širokokutna; Senzor vremena leta (ToF); Ostalo
el: Θέση κάμερας τηλεφώνου: Μπροστά; Μονόχρωμη; Πίσω βάθους; Πίσω μακροφωτογράφησης; Πίσω κύρια; Πίσω περισκοπική; Πίσω τηλεφακός; Πίσω υπερευρυγώνια; Πίσω ευρυγώνια; Χρόνος πτήσης (ToF); Άλλο